District of Columbia statutes.
23-903

“Fresh pursuit” defined.

For purposes of this chapter, the term “fresh pursuit” shall include fresh pursuit as defined by the common law, also the pursuit of a person who has committed a felony or one who the pursuing officer has reasonable grounds to believe has committed a felony. It shall also include the pursuit of a person who the pursuing officer has reasonable grounds to believe has committed a felony, although no felony has actually been committed, if there is reasonable ground for believing that a felony has been committed. Such term shall not necessarily imply an instant pursuit, but pursuit without unreasonable delay.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 634, Pub. L. 91-358, title II, § 210(a)
Apr. 30, 1988, D.C. Law 7-104, § 7(f), 35 DCR 147
1981 Ed., § 23-903.
1973 Ed., § 23-903.